test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-umbwltwks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - umbõltõks: # Noun 207 'eng /est õmblus/fin' - full paradigm
     umbõltõks+N+Sg+Nom: umbõltõks
     umbõltõks+N+Sg+Gen: umbõltõks
     umbõltõks+N+Sg+Par: umbõltõkst
     umbõltõks+N+Sg+Dat: umbõltõksõn
     umbõltõks+N+Sg+Ins: umbõltõksõks
     umbõltõks+N+Sg+Ill: umbõltõksõ
     umbõltõks+N+Sg+Ela: umbõltõksõst
     umbõltõks+N+Pl+Nom: umbõltõkst
     umbõltõks+N+Pl+Gen: umbõltõkst
     umbõltõks+N+Pl+Par: umbõltõkši
     umbõltõks+N+Pl+Dat: umbõltõkstõn
     umbõltõks+N+Pl+Ins: umbõltõkstõks
     umbõltõks+N+Pl+Ill: umbõltõkšiz
     umbõltõks+N+Pl+Ela: umbõltõkšist
